Hawaii statutes.
§348-7 Cooperative arrangements, etc.
Pursuant to the general policies of the department of human services, the
department is authorized:

(1) To cooperate with and
utilize the services of the state agency administering the public assistance
program, the Social Security Administration, and other federal, state, city and
county, and local public agencies providing services relating to vocational
rehabilitation, and with the state system of public employment offices in the
State, and shall make maximum feasible utilization of the job placement and
employment counseling services and other services and facilities of the offices;

(2) To cooperate with political
subdivisions and other public and nonprofit organizations and agencies, in
their establishment of workshops and rehabilitation facilities and, to the
extent feasible in providing vocational rehabilitation services, shall utilize
all the facilities meeting the standards established by the department;

(3) To enter into contractual
arrangements with the Social Security Administration, with respect to
certifications of disability and performance of other services, and with other
authorized public agencies for performance of services related to vocational
rehabilitation, for the agencies; and

(4) To contract with schools, hospitals, and other
agencies, and with doctors, nurses, technicians, and other persons, for
training, physical restoration, transportation, and other vocational
rehabilitation services. [L 1955, c 231, pt of §2; RL 1955, §42-36; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §18; HRS §348-7; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L
2015, c 35, §10]

Cross References

Administration of vocational rehabilitation, see §26-14.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next